Vermont, session 2025-2026, H142.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1973 is amended to read:
§ 1973. PERMITS
(a) Except as provided in this section and sections 1974 and 1978 of this
title, a person shall obtain a permit from the Secretary before:
* * *
(3) constructing, replacing, or modifying a potable water supply or
wastewater system;
* * *
(e) No permit issued by the Secretary shall be valid for a substantially
completed potable water supply and wastewater system until the Secretary
VT LEG #380298 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.142
2025 Page 2 of 3
receives a statement from an installer or a licensed designer certifying that, in
the exercise of his or her the installer’s or licensed designer’s reasonable
professional judgment, the installation-related information submitted is true
and correct and the potable water supply and wastewater system:
(1) were installed in accordance with:
(A) the permitted design and all permit conditions; or
(B) record drawings and such record drawings are in compliance with
the applicable rules, were filed with the Secretary, and are in accordance with
all other permit conditions;
(2) were inspected;
(3) were properly tested; and
(4) have successfully met those performance tests.
* * *
(h) All permits required under this section, all design and installation
certifications required under this section, all inspection certifications required
under this section, and all documents required by the rules adopted under this
chapter to be filed in the town records shall be properly indexed and recorded
in the land records pursuant to 24 V.S.A. §§ 1154 and 1161.
* * *
(k) Prior to conveyance of real property served by a wastewater system, the
seller of the property shall provide the buyer with a certificate of inspection of
VT LEG #380298 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.142
2025 Page 3 of 3
the wastewater system conducted within two years prior to the conveyance.
An inspection shall be conducted by a licensed designer who shall certify the
functionality of the wastewater system, evaluate the system for compliance
with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter, and
identify any maintenance or repair needs for the system. The licensed designer
shall file a certificate of inspection with the Secretary and shall file a copy of
the certificate of inspection in the lands records of the town where the
wastewater system is located.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380298 v.1